Virginia statutes. Title 51.1. Pensions, Benefits, and Retirement.
Article 3. Counties Having Urban County Executive Form of Government.

§ 51.1-821.
Police Retirement System.

Prior §§ 51-127.10 through 51-127.30 are continued in effect under subdivision 2 of §

51.1-805

as Chapter 303 of the Acts of Assembly of 1944, as amended.

History.

1990, c. 832.

§ 51.1-822.
Amendment, suspension, or revocation of retirement plan and trust.

The governing body of any county with an urban county executive form of government may by ordinance reserve the right to amend, suspend, or revoke the retirement plan and trust at any time, so long as the benefits payable under the plan are consistent with §

51.1-800

.
However, any amendment, suspension, or revocation shall not have the effect of diverting the trust fund to purposes other than the exclusive benefit of the participating employees or their beneficiaries until all liability for accrued benefits payable under the terms of the plan has been fully satisfied.

History.

1990, c. 832.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Appeal. —

Nothing in §

51.1-822

or

51.1-823

supported the contention that the word “board” referred only to the “policemen’s pension and retirement board;” Section

51.1-823

granted the right of appeal to retirement systems in counties having an urban county executive form of government, so a teacher had the right to appeal a denial of her application for service-connected disability benefits by respondent retirement system to a circuit court. Olsen v. Fairfax County Emples. Ret. Sys., 68 Va. Cir. 416, 2005 Va. Cir. LEXIS 127 (Fairfax County Aug. 22, 2005).

§ 51.1-823.
Appeal.

An appeal of right from the action of the retirement board of any county having an urban county executive form of government on any matter in which the board has discretionary power shall lie to the circuit court of the county which has jurisdiction of the board.

History.

1990, c. 832.

Law Review.

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Local Government Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2012).